Virginia statutes. Title 20. Domestic Relations.
Chapter 6. Divorce, Affirmation and Annulment.
§ 20-109. Changing maintenance and support for a spouse; effect of stipulations as to maintenance and support for a spouse; cessation upon cohabitation, remarriage, or death; effect of retirement.

Upon petition of either party the court may increase, decrease, or terminate the amount or duration of any spousal support and maintenance that may thereafter accrue, whether previously or hereafter awarded, as the circumstances may make proper. Upon order of the court based upon clear and convincing evidence that the spouse receiving support has been habitually cohabiting with another person in a relationship analogous to a marriage for one year or more commencing on or after July 1, 1997, the court shall terminate spousal support and maintenance unless (i) otherwise provided by stipulation or contract or (ii) the spouse receiving support proves by a preponderance of the evidence that termination of such support would be unconscionable. The provisions of this subsection shall apply to all orders and decrees for spousal support, regardless of the date of the suit for initial setting of support, the date of entry of any such order or decree, or the date of any petition for modification of support.

The court may consider a modification of an award of spousal support for a defined duration upon petition of either party filed within the time covered by the duration of the award. Upon consideration of the factors set forth in subsection E of § 20-107.1, the court may increase, decrease or terminate the amount or duration of the award upon finding that (i) there has been a material change in the circumstances of the parties, not reasonably in the contemplation of the parties when the award was made or (ii) an event which the court anticipated would occur during the duration of the award and which was significant in the making of the award, does not in fact occur through no fault of the party seeking the modification. The provisions of this subsection shall apply only to suits for initial spousal support orders filed on or after July 1, 1998, and suits for modification of spousal support orders arising from suits for initial support orders filed on or after July 1, 1998.

In suits for divorce, annulment and separate maintenance, and in proceedings arising under subdivision A 3 or subsection L of § 16.1-241, if a stipulation or contract signed by the party to whom such relief might otherwise be awarded is filed before entry of a final decree, no decree or order directing the payment of support and maintenance for the spouse, suit money, or counsel fee or establishing or imposing any other condition or consideration, monetary or nonmonetary, shall be entered except in accordance with that stipulation or contract. If such a stipulation or contract is filed after entry of a final decree and if any party so moves, the court shall modify its decree to conform to such stipulation or contract. No request for modification of spousal support based on a material change in circumstances or the terms of stipulation or contract shall be denied solely on the basis of the terms of any stipulation or contract that is executed on or after July 1, 2018, unless such stipulation or contract expressly states that the amount or duration of spousal support is non-modifiable.

Unless otherwise provided by stipulation or contract, spousal support and maintenance shall terminate upon the death of either party or remarriage of the spouse receiving support. The spouse entitled to support shall have an affirmative duty to notify the payor spouse immediately of remarriage at the last known address of the payor spouse.

For purposes of the modification of an award of spousal support, and without precluding the ability of a party to otherwise file for a modification of spousal support based upon any other material change in circumstances, the payor spouse's attainment of full retirement age shall be considered a material change in circumstances. For the purposes of this subsection, "full retirement age" means the normal retirement age at which a person is eligible to receive full retirement benefits under the federal Social Security Act, but "full retirement age" does not mean "early retirement age" as defined under the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. § 416, as amended).

In an action for the increase, decrease, or termination of spousal support based on the retirement of the payor spouse pursuant to subsection E, where the court finds that there has been a material change in circumstances, the court shall determine whether any modification or termination of such spousal support should be granted. In making such determination, the court may consider the factors set forth in subsection E of § 20-107.1 and shall consider the following factors:

Whether retirement was contemplated by the court and specifically considered by the court when the spousal support was awarded;

Whether the retirement is mandatory or voluntary, and the terms and conditions related to such retirement;

Whether the retirement would result in a change in the income of either the payor or the payee spouse;

The age and health of the parties;

The duration and amount of spousal support already paid; and

The assets or property interest of each of the parties during the period from the date of the support order and up to the date of the hearing on modification or termination.

In any action for the increase, decrease, or termination of spousal support, if the court finds that there has been a material change in circumstances, the court may consider the factors set forth in subsection E of § 20-107.1 and subsection F of this section in making its determination as to whether any modification or termination of such support should be granted. The court shall further consider the assets or property interest of each of the parties from the date of the support order and up to the time of the hearing on modification or termination, and any income generated from the asset or property interest. Any order granting or denying a request for the modification or termination of spousal support shall be accompanied by written findings and conclusions of the court identifying the factors set forth in subsection E of § 20-107.1 and subsection F of this section that support the court's order.

The provisions of this subsection (i) shall be subject to the provisions regarding stipulations or contracts as set forth in subsection C, and (ii) shall not apply to a contract or stipulation that is non-modifiable.

The provisions of this subsection and subsection E shall apply to suits for modification or termination of spousal support orders regardless of the date of the suit for initial setting of support or the date of entry of any such order or decree.

(Code 1919, § 5111; 1934, p. 516; 1938, p. 784; 1944, p. 397; 1948, p. 593; 1972, c. 482; 1975, c. 644; 1977, c. 222; 1978, c. 746; 1987, c. 694; 1994, c. 518; 1997, c. 241; 1998, c. 604; 2000, cc. 218, 221; 2001, cc. 725, 740; 2018, cc. 583, 701; 2020, c. 585.)

Cross references.

- As to maintenance and support of spouses, see also
§
20-107.1 and notes thereunder.

As to decree for support and maintenance as lien on real estate, see

§

8.01-460.

Editor's note.

- Acts 2001, cc. 725 and 740, cl. 2, repeal Acts 1998, c. 604, cl. 2, retroactively to July 1, 1998, as it relates to
§
20-109. Acts 1998, c. 604, cl. 2, had provided: "That the provisions of this act shall apply only to suits for initial spousal support orders filed on or after July 1, 1998, and suits for modification of spousal support orders arising from suits for initial support orders filed on or after July 1, 1998."

As amended by Acts 1998, c. 604,
§
20-109 reads as follows:

"

§

20-109. Changing maintenance and support for a spouse; effect of stipulations as to maintenance and support for a spouse; cessation upon cohabitation, remarriage or death.

"A. Upon petition of either party the court may increase, decrease, or terminate
the amount or duration of any
spousal support and maintenance that may thereafter accrue, whether previously or hereafter awarded, as the circumstances may make proper. Upon order of the court based upon clear and convincing evidence that the spouse receiving support has been habitually cohabiting with another person in a relationship analogous to a marriage for one year or more commencing on or after July 1, 1997, the court may decrease or terminate spousal support and maintenance unless (i) otherwise provided by stipulation or contract or (ii) the spouse receiving support proves by a preponderance of the evidence that termination of such support would constitute a manifest injustice.

"B. The court may consider a modification of an award of spousal support for a defined duration upon petition of either party filed within the time covered by the duration of the award. Upon consideration of the factors set forth in subsection E of
§

20-107.1, the court may increase, decrease or terminate the amount or duration of the award upon finding that (i) there has been a material change in the circumstances of the parties, not reasonably in the contemplation of the parties when the award was made or (ii) an event which the court anticipated would occur during the duration of the award and which was significant in the making of the award, does not in fact occur through no fault of the party seeking the modification.

"
B.
C.
In suits for divorce, annulment and separate maintenance, and in proceedings arising under subdivision A 3 or

subsection

L of

§

16.1-241, if a stipulation or contract signed by the party to whom such relief might otherwise be awarded is filed before entry of a final decree, no decree or order directing the payment of support and maintenance for the spouse, suit money, or counsel fee or establishing or imposing any other condition or consideration, monetary or nonmonetary, shall be entered except in accordance with that stipulation or contract. If such a stipulation or contract is filed after entry of a final decree and if any party so moves, the court shall modify its decree to conform to such stipulation or contract.

"
C.
D.
Unless otherwise provided by stipulation or contract, spousal support and maintenance shall terminate upon the death of either party or remarriage of the spouse receiving support."

The 2000 amendments.

- The 2000 amendment by c. 218, in the second sentence of subsection A, substituted "shall" for "may decrease or" and substituted "be unconscionable" for "constitute a manifest injustice" at the end thereof.

The 2000 amendment by c. 221 added the last sentence in subsection D.

The 2001 amendments.

- The 2001 amendments by cc. 725 and 740 are identical, and added the last sentence in subsections A and B.

The 2018 amendments.

- The 2018 amendment by c. 583 added subsections E through G.

The 2018 amendment by c. 701 added the third sentence in subsection C.

The 2020 amendments.

- The 2020 amendment by c. 585 substituted "expressly states that the amount or duration of spousal support is non-modifiable" for "contains the following language: 'The amount or duration of spousal support contained in this AGREEMENT is not modifiable except as specifically set forth in this AGREEMENT'" in subsection C in the last sentence.

Law review.

- For note, "Alimony and Property Settlement Agreements in Virginia," see 42 Va. L. Rev. 710 (1956). For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1969-1970, see 56 Va. L. Rev. 1411 (1970). For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1970-1971, see 57 Va. L. Rev. 1487 (1971). For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1971-1972, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 1257 (1972). For article, "Federal Taxation in Separation and Divorce," see 29 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1 (1972). For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1974-1975, see 61 Va. L. Rev. 1732 (1975). For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1975-1976, see 62 Va. L. Rev. 1431 (1976). For article, "Support v. Alimony in Virginia," see 12 U. Rich. L. Rev. 139 (1977). For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1976-1977, see 63 Va. L. Rev. 1418 (1977). For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1977-1978, see 64 Va. L. Rev. 1439 (1978). For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1978-1979, see 66 Va. L. Rev. 281 (1980). For survey of developments in Virginia domestic relations law for the year 1979-1980, see 67 Va. L. Rev. 351 (1981). For an overview of Virginia Supreme Court decisions on domestic relations, see 15 U. Rich. L. Rev. 321 (1981). For comment, "The Enforceability of Arbitration Clauses in Virginia Marital Separation Agreements," see 19 U. Rich. L. Rev. 333 (1985). For 1987 survey of Virginia domestic relations law, see 21 U. Rich. L. Rev. 745 (1987). For survey on domestic relations in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 561 (1989).

For an article, "Domestic Relations," see 31 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1069 (1997).

For an article relating to recent changes of formidable importance in major areas of domestic relations, both nationally and in Virginia, see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1165 (1998).

For a review of domestic relations law in Virginia for year 1999, see 33 U. Rich. L. Rev. 939 (1999).

For article, "Family Law," see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 651 (2001).

For article surveying developments in family law in Virginia, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 155 (2002).

For 2006 survey article, "Family and Juvenile Law," see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 151 (2006).

For note, "Estop in the Name of Love: A Case for Constructive Marriage in Virginia," see 49 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 973 (2007).

For annual survey article, "Family Law," see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 145 (2011).

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 6A M.J. Divorce and Alimony,
§§
58.10, 59, 65, 66, 69, 71, 72, 79; 9B M.J. Husband and Wife,

§

75.

§ 20-109.1. Affirmation, ratification and incorporation by reference in decree of agreement between parties.

Any court may affirm, ratify and incorporate by reference in its decree dissolving a marriage or decree of divorce whether from the bond of matrimony or from bed and board, or by a separate decree prior to or subsequent to such decree, or in a decree entered in a suit for annulment or separate maintenance, and in a proceeding arising under subsection A 3 or L of § 16.1-241, any valid agreement between the parties, or provisions thereof, concerning the conditions of the maintenance of the parties, or either of them and the care, custody and maintenance of their minor children, or establishing or imposing any other condition or consideration, monetary or nonmonetary. Provisions in such agreements for the modification of child support shall be valid and enforceable. Unless otherwise provided for in such agreement or decree incorporating such agreement, such future modifications shall not require a subsequent court decree. This section shall be subject to the provisions of § 20-108. Where the court affirms, ratifies and incorporates by reference in its decree such agreement or provision thereof, it shall be deemed for all purposes to be a term of the decree, and enforceable in the same manner as any provision of such decree. The provisions of this section shall apply to any decree hereinbefore or hereinafter entered affirming, ratifying and incorporating an agreement as provided herein. Upon the death or remarriage of the spouse receiving support, spousal support shall terminate unless otherwise provided by stipulation or contract. In any case where jurisdiction is obtained over a nonresident defendant by order of publication or by acceptance of service pursuant to § 20-99.1:1, any properly acknowledged and otherwise valid agreement entered into between the parties may be affirmed, ratified and incorporated as provided in this section.

(1970, c. 501; 1972, c. 482; 1978, c. 746; 1979, c. 659; 1982, c. 312; 1987, c. 424; 1996, c. 331; 2003, c. 260.)

The 2003 amendments.

- The 2003 amendment by c. 260 inserted the present second, third, and fourth sentences.

Law review.

- For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1969-1970, see 56 Va. L. Rev. 1411 (1970). For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1970-1971, see 57 Va. L. Rev. 1487 (1971). For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1971-1972, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 1257 (1972). For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1975-1976, see 62 Va. L. Rev. 1431 (1976). For article, "Sexual Relations After Separation or Divorce: The New Morality and the Old and New Divorce Laws," see 63 Va. L. Rev. 249 (1977). For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1976-1977, see 63 Va. L. Rev. 1418 (1977). For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1977-1978, see 64 Va. L. Rev. 1439 (1978). For survey of developments in Virginia domestic relations law for year 1979-1980, see 67 Va. L. Rev. 351 (1981). For an overview of Virginia Supreme Court decisions on domestic relations, see 15 U. Rich. L. Rev. 321 (1981). For comment, "The Enforceability of Arbitration Clauses in Virginia Marital Separation Agreements," see 19 U. Rich. L. Rev. 333 (1985). For 1987 survey of Virginia domestic relations law, see 21 U. Rich. L. Rev. 745 (1987).

For an article relating to recent changes of formidable importance in major areas of domestic relations, both nationally and in Virginia, see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1165 (1998).

For article surveying developments in family law in Virginia, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 155 (2002).

For annual survey article, "Family Law," see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 145 (2011).

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 6A M.J. Divorce and Alimony,
§§
35, 50, 53, 69, 79; 9B M.J. Husband and Wife,

§

75; 14B M.J. Process,

§

26; 18 M.J. Support and Maintenance,

§

5.

§ 20-110. Maintenance and support for a spouse to cease on remarriage.

If any former spouse to whom support and maintenance has been awarded shall thereafter marry, such support and maintenance shall cease as of the date of such marriage. The spouse entitled to current support shall have an affirmative duty to notify the payor spouse immediately of such remarriage. Failure of such spouse to notify the payor shall entitle the payor to restitution equal to the amount of any current support and maintenance paid after the date of the remarriage, together with interest from the date of the remarriage and reasonable attorney's fees and costs.

(Code 1919, § 5111; 1944, p. 397; 1948, p. 593; 1975, c. 644; 2000, c. 221.)

The 2000 amendments.

- The 2000 amendment by c. 221 added the second and third sentences.

Law review.

- For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1969-1970, see 56 Va. L. Rev. 1411 (1970). For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1970-1971, see 57 Va. L. Rev. 1487 (1971). For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1974-1975, see 61 Va. L. Rev. 1732 (1975). For article, "Sexual Relations After Separation or Divorce: The New Morality and the Old and New Divorce Laws," see 63 Va. L. Rev. 249 (1977). For an overview of Virginia Supreme Court decisions on domestic relations, see 15 U. Rich. L. Rev. 321 (1981).

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 6A M.J. Divorce and Alimony,
§§
58.2, 71.

Editor's note.

- Many of the cases cited below were decided under this section as it existed prior to the 1975 amendment.

§ 20-111. Decree of divorce from bond of matrimony extinguishes contingent property rights.

Upon the entry of a decree of divorce from the bond of matrimony, all contingent rights of either consort in the real and personal property of the other then existing, or thereafter acquired, including the right of survivorship in real or personal property title to which is vested in the parties as joint tenants or as tenants by the entirety, with survivorship as at common law, shall be extinguished, and such estate by the entirety shall thereupon be converted into a tenancy in common.

(Code 1919, § 5111; 1926, p. 105; 1927, p. 184; 1934, p. 516; 1938, p. 784; 1944, p. 397; 1948, p. 593.)

Law review.

- For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1970-1971, see 57 Va. L. Rev. 1487 (1971). For article entitled, "Federal Taxation in Separation and Divorce," see 29 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1 (1972). For comment, "Multiple-Party Accounts: Does Virginia Law Correspond With the Expectations of the Average Depositor?," see 14 U. Rich. L. Rev. 851 (1980). For an overview of Virginia Supreme Court decisions on domestic relations, see 15 U. Rich. L. Rev. 321 (1981).

For article, "The Federal Law of Property: The Case of Inheritance Disclaimers and Tenancy by the Entireties," see 75 Wash & Lee L. Rev. 3 (2018).

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 5C M.J. Curtesy,
§
17; 6A M.J. Divorce and Alimony,

§§

50, 51, 58.2.

§ 20-111.1. Revocation of death benefits by divorce or annulment.

Except as otherwise provided under federal law or law of this Commonwealth, upon the entry of a decree of annulment or divorce from the bond of matrimony on and after July 1, 1993, any revocable beneficiary designation contained in a then existing written contract owned by one party that provides for the payment of any death benefit to the other party is revoked. A death benefit prevented from passing to a former spouse by this section shall be paid as if the former spouse had predeceased the decedent. The payor of any death benefit shall be discharged from all liability upon payment in accordance with the terms of the contract providing for the death benefit, unless the payor receives written notice of a revocation under this section prior to payment.

The term "death benefit" includes any payments under a life insurance contract, annuity, retirement arrangement, compensation agreement or other contract designating a beneficiary of any right, property or money in the form of a death benefit.

This section shall not apply (i) to the extent a decree of annulment or divorce from the bond of matrimony, or a written agreement of the parties provides for a contrary result as to specific death benefits, or (ii) to any trust or any death benefit payable to or under any trust.

If this section is preempted by federal law with respect to the payment of any death benefit, a former spouse who, not for value, receives the payment of any death benefit that the former spouse is not entitled to under this section is personally liable for the amount of the payment to the person who would have been entitled to it were this section not preempted.

Every decree of annulment or divorce from the bond of matrimony entered on or after July 1, 2012, shall contain the following notice in conspicuous, bold print:

Beneficiary designations for any death benefit, as defined in subsection B of § 20-111.1 of the Code of Virginia, made payable to a former spouse may or may not be automatically revoked by operation of law upon the entry of a final decree of annulment or divorce. If a party intends to revoke any beneficiary designation made payable to a former spouse following the annulment or divorce, the party is responsible for following any and all instructions to change such beneficiary designation given by the provider of the death benefit. Otherwise, existing beneficiary designations may remain in full force and effect after the entry of a final decree of annulment or divorce.

(1993, c. 417; 2007, c. 306; 2012, c. 493.)

The 2007 amendments.

- The 2007 amendment by c. 306 inserted the subsection designations and added subsection D.

The 2012 amendments.

- The 2012 amendment by c. 493 added the exception at the beginning of the first sentence in subsection A, and added subsection E.

Law review.

- For 2007 annual survey article, "Family and Juvenile Law," see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 417 (2007).

For
article on 2007 and 2008 legislative and judicial developments in the areas of wills, trusts, and estates, see 43 U. Rich. L. Rev. 435 (2008).

For annual survey of Virginia law article, "Wills, Trusts, and Estates," see 47 U. Rich. L. Rev. 343 (2012).

For annual survey article, "Family Law," see 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 135 (2013).

For annual survey article, "Wills, Trusts, and Estates," see 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 189 (2013).

Research References.

- Harrison on Wills & Administration for Virginia and West Virginia (Matthew Bender). Chapter 10 Revocation of Wills.
§
10.13 By Divorce of Testator. Cox.

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 6A M.J. Divorce and Alimony,
§
50.

§ 20-112. Notice when proceedings reopened.

When the proceedings are reopened to increase, decrease or terminate maintenance and support for a spouse or for a child, or to request additional orders to effectuate previous orders entered pursuant to § 20-107.3, the petitioning party shall give such notice to the other party by service of process or by order of publication as is required by law. Except as provided by § 20-110, no support order may be retroactively modified, but may be modified with respect to any period during which there is a pending petition for modification in any court, but only from the date that notice of such petition has been given to the responding party.

(Code 1919, § 5111; 1944, p. 397; 1948, p. 593; 1975, c. 644; 1987, c. 649; 1991, c. 698; 2000, c. 221; 2004, c. 204.)

The 2000 amendments.

- The 2000 amendment by c. 221 inserted "Except as provided by
§
20-110" at the beginning of the last sentence.

The 2004 amendments.

- The 2004 amendment by c. 204 inserted "in any court" in the last sentence.

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 6A M.J. Divorce and Alimony,
§§
57, 58.2, 70.

§ 20-113. Procedure when respondent fails to perform order for support and maintenance of child or spouse or owes support and maintenance or additional support and maintenance.

The court, when it finds the respondent has failed to perform the order of the court concerning the custody or the maintenance and support of the child or support and maintenance of the spouse, or under the existing circumstances is under the duty to render support or additional support to the child or to pay for the support and maintenance of the spouse, may proceed to deal with the respondent as provided in §§ 20-79.1, 20-114, and 20-115. In addition, the court may enter a qualified domestic relations order or other order for the purpose of enforcing a support order by attaching or garnishing any pension, profit-sharing, or deferred compensation plan or retirement benefits pursuant to the United States Internal Revenue Code or other applicable federal laws. The court may revise and alter its decree as to the child or support and maintenance of the spouse, and grant leave to the petitioner to proceed in the appropriate juvenile and domestic relations district court in conformity with any applicable law; or it may, at the application of any party or on its own motion certify its final order granting support of the child or support and maintenance of the spouse to such juvenile and domestic relations district court for enforcement of collection as though such order had been made in such juvenile and domestic relations district court, in accordance with § 20-79 (c).

When the petitioner has been granted leave to proceed in a juvenile and domestic relations district court all proceedings thereafter shall conform to the provisions of Chapter 5 (§ 20-61 et seq.).

(Code 1919, § 5111; 1944, p. 398; 1948, p. 593; 1964, c. 273; 1968, c. 483; 1970, c. 761; 1975, c. 644; 1982, c. 298; 2012, c. 39.)

Editor's note.

- Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, "only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources, including all local costs, for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth." The funding was not provided.

The 2012 amendments.

- The 2012 amendment by c. 39 added the present second sentence of the first paragraph, and deleted "of this title" at the end of the second paragraph.

Law review.

- For comment, "Lack of Due Process in Virginia Contempt Proceeding for Failure to Comply with Order for Support and Alimony," see 4 U. Rich. L. Rev. 128 (1969).

For annual survey article, "Family Law," see 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 135 (2013).

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 1B M.J. Appeal and Error,
§
86; 6A M.J. Divorce and Alimony,

§

57.

§ 20-114. Recognizance for compliance with order or decree.

Upon the entry, or thereafter, of any order or decree for support and maintenance for a spouse or a child or children in a pending or concluded divorce suit, a mensa et thoro or a vinculo matrimonii or suit for separate maintenance, the court in its discretion may require the giving of a recognizance, with or without surety, for compliance therewith, by the party against whom such order or decree is entered.

(1942, p. 639; Michie Code 1942, § 5111a; 1975, c. 644.)

Cross references.

- As to failure to comply with support obligation, see
§
16.1-278.16.

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 6A M.J. Divorce and Alimony,
§§
46, 72.2.

Applied

in Canavos v. Canavos, 205 Va. 744, 139 S.E.2d 825 (1965); Davis v. Davis, 206 Va. 381, 143 S.E.2d 835 (1965); Lawrence v. Lawrence, 212 Va. 44, 181 S.E.2d 640 (1971).

§ 20-115. Commitment and sentence for failure to comply with order or decree.

Upon failure or refusal to give the recognizance provided for in § 20-114, or upon conviction of any party for contempt of court in (i) failing or refusing to comply with any order or decree for support and maintenance for a spouse or for a child or children or (ii) willfully failing or refusing to comply with any order entered pursuant to § 20-103 or § 20-107.3, the court (i) may commit and sentence such party to a local correctional facility as provided for in § 20-61 and (ii) may assign the party to a work release program pursuant to § 53.1-131 or to perform public service work; in either event the assignment shall be for a fixed or indeterminate period or until the further order of the court. However, in no event shall commitment or work assignment be for more than twelve months. The sum or sums as provided for in § 20-63, shall be paid as therein set forth, to be used for the support and maintenance of the spouse or the child or children for whose benefit such order or decree provided.

(1942, p. 639; Michie Code 1942, § 5111a; 1975, c. 644; 1991, c. 698; 1995, c. 428.)

Cross references.

- As to failure to comply with support obligation, see
§
16.1-278.16.

Law review.

- For comment, "Lack of Due Process in Virginia Contempt Proceeding for Failure to Comply with Order for Support and Alimony," see 4 U. Rich. L. Rev. 128 (1969).

Research References.

- Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 18 Enforcement of Judgments and Decrees.
§
18.03 Equity. Bryson.

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 6A M.J. Divorce and Alimony,
§§
57, 75.

Editor's note.

- Many of the cases cited below were decided under this section as it existed prior to the 1975 amendment.

§ 20-116. Effect of divorce from bed and board and what court may decree.

In granting a divorce from bed and board, the court may decree that the parties be perpetually separated and protected in their persons and property. Such decree shall operate upon property thereafter acquired, and upon the personal rights and legal capacities of the parties, as a decree for a divorce from the bond of matrimony, except that neither party shall marry again during the life of the other.

(Code 1919, § 5112.)

Law review.

- For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1978-1979, see 66 Va. L. Rev. 281 (1980). For comment on valuation of spousal interest in a professional practice for equitable distribution, see 17 U. Rich. L. Rev. 383 (1983).

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 5C M.J. Curtesy,
§
17; 6A M.J. Divorce and Alimony,

§

52; 6B M.J. Dower,

§

48.

§ 20-117. Divorce from bond of matrimony after divorce from bed and board.

The granting of a divorce from bed and board shall not be a bar to either party obtaining a divorce from the bonds of matrimony on any ground which would justify a divorce from the bonds of matrimony if no divorce from bed and board had been granted, unless the cause for absolute divorce was existing and known to the party applying for the divorce from the bonds of matrimony before the decree of divorce from bed and board was entered.

(1934, p. 504; Michie Code 1942, § 5112a.)

Law review.

- For article, "Sexual Relations After Separation or Divorce: The New Morality and the Old and New Divorce Laws," see 63 Va. L. Rev. 249 (1977). For article, "The Role of Fault in Virginia Divorce Proceedings," see 20 U. Rich. L. Rev. 295 (1986).

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 6A M.J. Divorce and Alimony,
§§
4, 6, 26.

§ 20-118. Prohibition of remarriage pending appeal from divorce decree; certain marriages validated.

On the dissolution of the bond of matrimony for any cause arising subsequent to the date of the marriage, if objections or exceptions are noted or filed to the final decree and a bond is given staying the execution thereof, the court shall decree that neither party shall remarry pending the perfecting of an appeal from said final judgment of the trial court.

Marriages heretofore celebrated in violation of any prohibition against remarriage shall not hereafter be deemed to be invalid because of the violation of such prohibition, provided that the parties to such a marriage have continued to reside together as husband and wife until the first day of July, 1960, or until such time as one of the parties dies prior to July 1, 1960.

(Code 1919, § 5113; 1934, p. 445; 1944, p. 181; 1960, c. 399; 1962, c. 290.)

Law review.

- For article surveying developments in real estate and land use law in Virginia from June 1, 2001 through June 1, 2002, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 271 (2002).

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 3A M.J. Bigamy,
§
2; 6A M.J. Divorce and Alimony,

§

45.

§ 20-119.

Repealed by Acts 1975, c. 644.

§ 20-120. Revocation of decree from bed and board.

A decree of divorce from bed and board entered in a suit pursuant to § 20-95 shall at any time thereafter, upon submission of an order endorsed by both parties or counsel, be revoked by the same court which entered such decree of divorce.

(Code 1919, § 5115; 1926, p. 859; 1934, p. 21; 1942, p. 158; 1946, p. 264; 1948, p. 539; 1975, c. 644; 1984, c. 537.)

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 6A M.J. Divorce and Alimony,
§
46.

§ 20-121. Merger of decree for divorce from bed and board with decree for divorce from bond of matrimony.

In any case where a decree of divorce from bed and board has been granted, and the court shall determine that one year has elapsed since the event which gave rise to such divorce or, in any case where the parties have entered into a separation agreement and there are no minor children either born of the parties, born of either party and adopted by the other or adopted by both parties, that six months has elapsed since such event, and the parties have been separated without interruption since such divorce was granted and no reconciliation is probable, it may merge such decree into a decree for divorce from the bond of matrimony upon application of either party. The injured party need not give the guilty party notice of his application to the court if such application is limited to such merger nor of the taking of depositions in support thereof, but shall give due notice if he raises new matters. If the guilty party initiates proceedings for such merger he shall give the other party ten days' notice thereof. No final decree for divorce entered in such a case shall terminate or otherwise affect any restraining order, or order for the payment of costs, counsel fees, support and maintenance for a spouse or child or children except as specifically provided in such decree. The provisions of this section shall apply to the divorces from bed and board, which have been heretofore granted.

(Code 1919, § 5115; 1926, p. 859; 1934, p. 21; 1942, p. 158; 1946, p. 264; 1948, p. 539; 1950, p. 634; 1952, c. 100; 1960, c. 19; 1968, c. 326; 1975, c. 644; 1979, c. 1; 1987, c. 38; 1988, c. 404.)

Law review.

- For discussion of constructive desertion as a ground for divorce in Virginia, see 47 Va. L. Rev. 362 (1961). For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1974-1975, see 61 Va. L. Rev. 1732 (1975). For article, "Sexual Relations After Separation or Divorce: The New Morality and the Old and New Divorce Laws," see 63 Va. L. Rev. 249 (1977).

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 6A M.J. Divorce and Alimony,
§§
4, 19, 35.

§ 20-121.01. Decree of divorce from bonds of matrimony without decree from bed and board.

In any case where willful desertion or cruelty is the ground for divorce and the bill of complaint prays for a divorce from bed and board the court may enter a decree of divorce from the bonds of matrimony without the entry of a decree from bed and board if the statutory period, as set out in § 20-121, has elapsed prior to the entry of said decree and if the court shall be of the opinion that no reconciliation has taken place, or is probable.

(1956, c. 93; 1970, c. 538; 1975, c. 644.)

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 6A M.J. Divorce and Alimony,
§§
18, 19.

§ 20-121.02. Decree of divorce without amended bill or amended cross-bill.

In any divorce suit wherein a bill of complaint or cross-bill prays for a divorce from the bonds of matrimony under § 20-91 or prays for a divorce from bed and board under § 20-95, at such time as there exists in either party's favor grounds for a divorce from the bonds of matrimony under § 20-91 A (9), either party may move the court wherein such divorce suit is pending for a divorce from the bonds of matrimony on the grounds set out in § 20-91 A (9) without amending the bill of complaint or cross-bill.

(1977, c. 283; 1984, c. 633; 1986, c. 252; 1988, c. 362; 1989, c. 207.)

Editor's note.

- At the direction of the Code Commission, "20-91 A (9)" was substituted for "20-91 (9)" in two instances.

Law review.

- For 1995 survey of domestic relations, see 29 U. Rich. L. Rev. 993 (1995).

For an article, "A Dead Language:
Divorce Law and Practice Before No-fault," see 86 Va. L. Rev. 1497 (2000).

For essay, "Nonsuit in Virginia Civil Trials," see 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 265 (2013).